apertium-ht-en.ht.dix
    <pardef n="isit__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="prpers__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mwen</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ou</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>li</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nou</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>yo</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>m</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="uns"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>m'</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="uns"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>w</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="uns"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>l</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="uns"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>l'</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="uns"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>n</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="uns"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>n'</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="uns"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>y</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="uns"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>y'</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="uns"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

   <pardef n="okenn__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="anyen__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
  </pardefs>

    <e lm="prpers"><i></i><par n="prpers__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="okenn"><i>okenn</i><par n="okenn__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="anyen"><i>anyen</i><par n="anyen__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="isit"><i>isit</i><par n="isit__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="soutou"><i>soutou</i><par n="isit__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="tanpri"><i>tanpri</i><par n="isit__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="anba"><i>anba</i><par n="isit__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="grav"><i>grav</i><par n="isit__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="pa"><i>pa</i><par n="isit__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="kont"><i>kont</i><par n="isit__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="konsa"><i>konsa</i><par n="isit__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="egzakteman"><i>egzakteman</i><par n="isit__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="prese-prese"><i>prese-prese</i><par n="isit__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="direkteman"><i>direkteman</i><par n="isit__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="egzatteman" r="LR"><p><l>egzatteman</l><r>egzakteman</r></p><par n="isit__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="lonton"><i>lonton</i><par n="isit__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="nan apremidi"><i>nan<b/>apremidi</i><par n="isit__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="nan aprè midi" r="LR"><p><l>nan<b/>aprè<b/>midi</l><r>nan<b/>apremidi</r></p><par n="isit__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="yè"><i>yè</i><par n="isit__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="l demen"><i>l<b/>demen</i><par n="isit__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="nan konmansman"><i>nan<b/>konmansman</i><par n="isit__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="wi"><i>wi</i><par n="isit__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="non"><i>non</i><par n="isit__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="chak fwa"><i>chak<b/>fwa</i><par n="isit__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="chak jou"><i>chak<b/>jou</i><par n="isit__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="okenn kote"><i>okenn<b/>kote</i><par n="isit__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="sètadi"><i>sètadi</i><par n="isit__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="tou patou"><i>tou<b/>patou</i><par n="isit__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="tou"><i>tou</i><par n="isit__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="espesyalman"><i>espesyalman</i><par n="isit__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="la"><i>la</i><par n="isit__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="byen"><i>byen</i><par n="isit__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="bokou pli"><i>bokou<b/>pli</i><par n="isit__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="deja"><i>deja</i><par n="isit__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="dyagonalman"><i>dyagonalman</i><par n="isit__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="egalman"><i>egalman</i><par n="isit__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="entegralman"><i>entegralman</i><par n="isit__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="entènasyonalman"><i>entènasyonalman</i><par n="isit__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="finalman"><i>finalman</i><par n="isit__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="fondamantalman"><i>fondamantalman</i><par n="isit__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="globalman"><i>globalman</i><par n="isit__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ilegalman"><i>ilegalman</i><par n="isit__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="jeneralman"><i>jeneralman</i><par n="isit__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="legalman"><i>legalman</i><par n="isit__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="literalman"><i>literalman</i><par n="isit__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="lokalman"><i>lokalman</i><par n="isit__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="lwayalman"><i>lwayalman</i><par n="isit__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="mantalman"><i>mantalman</i><par n="isit__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="medikalman"><i>medikalman</i><par n="isit__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="mizikalman"><i>mizikalman</i><par n="isit__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="mondyalman"><i>mondyalman</i><par n="isit__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="moralman"><i>moralman</i><par n="isit__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="nasyonalman"><i>nasyonalman</i><par n="isit__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="nòmalman"><i>nòmalman</i><par n="isit__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="oralman"><i>oralman</i><par n="isit__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="orijinalman"><i>orijinalman</i><par n="isit__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="orizontalman"><i>orizontalman</i><par n="isit__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="prensipalman"><i>prensipalman</i><par n="isit__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="radikalman"><i>radikalman</i><par n="isit__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="santralman"><i>santralman</i><par n="isit__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="sosyalman"><i>sosyalman</i><par n="isit__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="totalman"><i>totalman</i><par n="isit__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="vèbalman"><i>vèbalman</i><par n="isit__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="vètikalman"><i>vètikalman</i><par n="isit__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="kounye a"><i>kounye<b/>a</i><par n="isit__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="mwatye"><i>mwatye</i><par n="isit__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="depi"><i>depi</i><par n="isit__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="depi kilè"><i>depi<b/>kilè</i><par n="isit__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ajenou"><i>ajenou</i><par n="isit__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="a ki lè"><i>a<b/>ki<b/>lè</i><par n="isit__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="alèkile"><i>alèkile</i><par n="isit__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="alèkile"><i>alèkile</i><par n="isit__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="a midi"><i>a<b/>midi</i><par n="isit__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="apeprè"><i>apeprè</i><par n="isit__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="anvanyè"><i>anvanyè</i><par n="isit__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ase"><i>ase</i><par n="isit__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="aswè-a"><i>aswè-a</i><par n="isit__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="atè"><i>atè</i><par n="isit__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="atò"><i>atò</i><par n="isit__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="anba chal"><i>anba<b/>chal</i><par n="isit__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="an chantan"><i>an<b/>chantan</i><par n="isit__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="an detay"><i>an<b/>detay</i><par n="isit__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="andeyò"><i>andeyò</i><par n="isit__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="an dyagonal"><i>an<b/>dyagonal</i><par n="isit__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="anfòm"><i>anfòm</i><par n="isit__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ankò"><i>ankò</i><par n="isit__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="anlè"><i>anlè</i><par n="isit__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="annik"><i>annik</i><par n="isit__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="an rapò"><i>an<b/>rapò</i><par n="isit__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="anreta"><i>anreta</i><par n="isit__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ansamn"><i>ansamn</i><par n="isit__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="antouka"><i>antouka</i><par n="isit__adv"/></e>
